Maine, session 132, LD159.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §401, sub-§3, ¶B, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2
and affected by Pt. B, §5, is amended to read:
B. A certificate of registration that contains the name, place of residence and address
of the registered owner. The reverse side of the certificate of registration must provide
a blank space in which the registered owner may write the legal name and address of
an emergency contact.
Sec. 2. Emergency contact information; implementation by Secretary of
State. The Department of the Secretary of State shall begin issuing certificates of
registration that comply with this Act when the Department of the Secretary of State
replaces its stock of certificates of registration.
Page 1 - 132LR0524(03)